Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4005
Execution of power of attorney.

A power of attorney must
be signed by the principal or marked by the principal in accordance with section
64-105.02 or signed in the principal's conscious presence by another individual
directed by the principal to sign the principal's name on the power of attorney.
A signature or mark on a power of attorney is presumed to be genuine if the
principal acknowledges the signature before a notary public or other individual
authorized by law to take acknowledgments. A power of attorney under the Nebraska
Uniform Power of Attorney Act is not valid unless it is acknowledged before
a notary public or other individual authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 5.